Utah statutes.
16-6a-802.   Qualifications of directors.
(1)  A director shall be:
(a)  a natural person; and
(b)  18 years of age or older.
(2)  The bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors in addition
to the requirements under Subsection (1).
(3)  A director need not be a resident of this state or a member of the
nonprofit corporation unless required by the bylaws.
